District of Columbia statutes.
46-305.02

Employer’s compliance with income-withholding order of another state.

(a)

Upon receipt of an income-withholding order, the obligor’s employer shall immediately provide a copy of the order to the obligor.

(b)

The employer shall treat an income-withholding order issued in another state which appears regular on its face as if it had been issued by a tribunal of the District.

(c)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section and § 46-305.03, the employer shall withhold and distribute the funds as directed in the withholding order by complying with terms of the order which specify:

(1)

The duration and amount of periodic payments of current child support stated as a sum certain;

(2)

The person designated to receive payments and the address to which the payments are to be forwarded;

(3)

Medical support, whether in the form of periodic cash payment stated as a sum certain, or ordering the obligor to provide health insurance coverage for the child under a policy available through the obligor’s employment;

(4)

The amount of periodic payments of fees and costs for a support enforcement agency, the issuing tribunal, and the obligee’s attorney stated as sums certain; and

(5)

The amount of periodic payments of arrearages and interest on arrearages stated as sums certain.

(d)

An employer shall comply with the law of the state of the obligor’s principal place of employment for withholding from income with respect to:

(1)

The employer’s fee for processing an income-withholding order;

(2)

The maximum amount permitted to be withheld from the obligor’s income; and

(3)

The times within which the employer must implement the withholding order and forward the child support payment.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 502
as added July 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-131, § 2(i), 45 DCR 2924
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(e)(2), 53 DCR 3634

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-345.2.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137, in par. (c)(2), deleted “or agency” following “person”.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(i) of Uniform Interstate Family Support Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-94, April 29, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2785).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of section, see § 2(i) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-225, December 23, 1997, 45 DCR 151), and § 2(i) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-310, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1950).

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 12-131: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 46-301.01.

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 502 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).